Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1513.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. ORS 696.370 is amended to read:
696.370. (1) As used in this section, “real estate team” means a subdivision of a registered
business that performs professional real estate activities and is comprised of one or more real estate
licensees operating under a name other than the registered business name.
(2) Upon approval of the managing principal broker, some or all associated real estate licensees
in the main office or in a branch office may form a real estate team.
(3) Before entering into a written representation agreement or listing agreement with a buyer
or seller, a member of a real estate team shall provide a disclosure to the client in the manner es-
tablished by the Real Estate Agency by rule. The form established by the agency must disclose the
following information:
(a) The name and role of each member of the real estate team;
(b) Whether individual members of the real estate team are real estate licensees;
(c) The name of any members of the real estate team responsible for supervision and control of
some or all members of the real estate team, if any;
(d) The name of the managing principal broker with whom the real estate licensees on the real
estate team are associated and the registered business name of the brokerage; and
(e) A statement to the effect that the real estate team must have a disclosed limited agency
agreement in place before any members of the real estate team may perform any professional real
estate activities for a buyer or seller, when the real estate team either already represents another
buyer or seller in the same real estate transaction or already represents another buyer who wants
to purchase the same property.
(4) A real estate team member must be a principal real estate broker before the real estate team
member may supervise or control the actions of any other real estate team members. Unless the real
estate team member is the managing principal broker, real estate team members who supervise or
control the actions of other real estate team members must have a written supervisory agreement
with the managing principal broker as described in ORS 696.310.
[(5) A name of a real estate team may not include the terms “realty” or “real estate” and may not
be identical to the registered business name.]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1513 (SB 1513-A) Page 1

[(6)] (5) A real estate team may not perform professional real estate activities for a buyer or
seller when the real estate team either already represents another buyer or seller in the same real
estate transaction or already represents another buyer who wants to purchase the same property,
unless the real estate team has entered into a disclosed limited agency agreement with the buyer
and seller or with the multiple buyers respectively.
SECTION 2. ORS 696.370, as amended by section 1 of this 2026 Act, is amended to read:
696.370. (1) As used in this section, “real estate team” means a subdivision of a registered
business that performs professional real estate activities and is comprised of one or more real estate
licensees operating under a name other than the registered business name.
(2) Upon approval of the managing principal broker, some or all associated real estate licensees
in the main office or in a branch office may form a real estate team.
(3) Before entering into a written representation agreement or listing agreement with a buyer
or seller, a member of a real estate team shall provide a disclosure to the client in the manner es-
tablished by the Real Estate Agency by rule. The form established by the agency must disclose the
following information:
(a) The name and role of each member of the real estate team;
(b) Whether individual members of the real estate team are real estate licensees;
(c) The name of any members of the real estate team responsible for supervision and control of
some or all members of the real estate team, if any;
(d) The name of the managing principal broker with whom the real estate licensees on the real
estate team are associated and the registered business name of the brokerage; and
(e) A statement to the effect that the real estate team must have a disclosed limited agency
agreement in place before any members of the real estate team may perform any professional real
estate activities for a buyer or seller, when the real estate team either already represents another
buyer or seller in the same real estate transaction or already represents another buyer who wants
to purchase the same property.
(4) A real estate team member must be a principal real estate broker before the real estate team
member may supervise or control the actions of any other real estate team members. Unless the real
estate team member is the managing principal broker, real estate team members who supervise or
control the actions of other real estate team members must have a written supervisory agreement
with the managing principal broker as described in ORS 696.310.
(5) A real estate team may not perform professional real estate activities for a buyer or seller
when the real estate team either already represents another buyer or seller in the same real estate
transaction or already represents another buyer who wants to purchase the same property, unless
the real estate team has entered into a disclosed limited agency agreement with the buyer and seller
or with the multiple buyers respectively.
(6) A name of a real estate team may not include the terms “realty” or “real estate” and
may not be identical to the registered business name.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 696.370 by section 2 of this 2026 Act become oper-
ative on July 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1513 (SB 1513-A) Page 2

Passed by Senate February 19, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by House March 2, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1513 (SB 1513-A) Page 3